Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending Section 256 of the Constitution of
Kentucky to permit constitutional amendments to be submitted to the voters by ballot
question or summary that clearly describes the substance and effect of the amendment,
rather than requiring the full text of the amendment to appear on the ballot, as stated
below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 256 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
Amendments to this Constitution may be proposed in either House of the General
Assembly at a regular session, and if such amendment or amendments shall be agreed to
by three-fifths of all the members elected to each House, such proposed amendment or
amendments, with the yeas and nays of the members of each House taken thereon, shall
be entered in full in their respective journals. Then such proposed amendment or
amendments shall be submitted to the voters of the State for their ratification or rejection
at the next general election for members of the House of Representatives, the vote to be
taken thereon in such manner as the General Assembly may provide, and to be certified
by the officers of election to the Secretary of State in such manner as shall be provided by
law, which vote shall be compared and certified by the same board authorized by law to
compare the polls and give certificates of election to officers for the State at large. The
full text of the proposed amendment shall not be required to be printed on the ballot.
Instead, it shall be submitted to the voters of the State in the form of a ballot question
or summary that clearly and accurately states the substance and effect of the proposed
amendment. If it shall appear that a majority of the votes cast for and against an
amendment at said election was for the amendment, then the same shall become a part of
the Constitution of this Commonwealth, and shall be so proclaimed by the Governor, and
Page 1 of 3
BR166700.100 - 1667 - XXXX 3/10/2026 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1667
published in such manner as the General Assembly may direct. Said amendments shall
not be submitted at an election which occurs less than ninety days from the final passage
of such proposed amendment or amendments. Not more than four amendments shall be
voted upon at any one time. If two or more amendments shall be submitted at the same
time, they shall be submitted in such manner that the electors shall vote for or against
each of such amendments separately, but an amendment may relate to a single subject or
to related subject matters and may amend or modify as many articles and as many
sections of the Constitution as may be necessary and appropriate in order to accomplish
the objectives of the amendment. The approval of the Governor shall not be necessary to
any bill, order, resolution or vote of the General Assembly, proposing an amendment or
amendments to this Constitution.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
Page 2 of 3
BR166700.100 - 1667 - XXXX 3/10/2026 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1667
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
BR166700.100 - 1667 - XXXX 3/10/2026 3:10 PM Jacketed